Louisiana, session 2026, HB833.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Chapter 3-H of Title 15 of Title 15 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of
1950, comprised of R.S. 15:563.5, is hereby enacted to read as follows:
CHAPTER 3-H. SEXUAL ASSAULT SURVIVOR EMPOWERMENT TASK FORCE
§563.5. Sexual Assault Survivor Empowerment Task Force
A. The Legislature of Louisiana creates in this Section the Sexual Assault
Survivor Empowerment Task Force to study, evaluate, and make recommendations
for legislation to provide access to services for survivors of sexual assault. Such
services may include counseling, school or work accommodations, public awareness
campaigns, and mandatory training for schools, hospitals, and law enforcement.
B. Task force membership consists of all of the following:
(1) A representative from the office of the attorney general.
(2) A representative of the Louisiana Sheriffs' Association.
(3) One member of the House of Representatives appointed by the speaker
of the House of Representatives.
(4) One member of the Senate appointed by the president of the Senate.
(5) A representative of the Louisiana District Attorneys Association.
(6) A representative of the Louisiana State Coroner's Association.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 833 ENROLLED
(7) One member who is a survivor of sexual violence appointed by Sexual
Trauma Awareness and Response (STAR).
(8) A licensed clinical social worker appointed by the Louisiana State Board
of Social Work Examiners.
C. The task force shall prepare and submit a report of its findings and
recommendations, including but not limited to any specific legislation, to the
governor, the speaker of the House of Representatives, the president of the Senate,
the chair of the Senate Committee on Judiciary B, and the chair of the House
Committee on Judiciary no later than February 1, 2027. A copy of the report shall
also be submitted to the David R. Poynter Legislative Research Library as required
by R.S. 24:771 and 772. The task force shall make the report available for public
access.
D. This Chapter shall terminate on February 1, 2027.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.